Florida, session 2026, SB1268.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 82 83 Section 1.âSubsection (3) of section 626.112, Florida 84 Statutes, is amended to read: 85 626.112âLicense and appointment required; agents, customer 86 representatives, adjusters, insurance agencies, service 87 representatives, managing general agents, insurance adjusting 88 firms.â 89 (3)âA No person may not shall act as an adjuster as to any 90 class of business for which he or she is not then licensed and 91 appointed. If an adjuster lacks an active license or appointment 92 while adjusting an insurance claim, the department must take 93 immediate enforcement action against both the adjuster and the 94 insurer employing, contracting with, or directing such adjuster. 95 Section 2.âPresent subsections (8) through (10) of section 96 626.2815, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (9) 97 through (11), respectively, and a new subsection (8) is added to 98 that section, to read: 99 626.2815âContinuing education requirements.â 100 (8)(a)âAn adjuster who is not a resident of this state must 101 complete 24 hours of Florida-specific continuing education 102 courses annually as part of the requirements imposed under this 103 section. 104 (b)âThe courses required under this subsection must be 105 delivered by recorded instruction and must include statutes, 106 administrative rules, ethical duties, and claims-handling 107 standards applicable to adjusting insurance claims within this 108 state. 109 Section 3.âParagraphs (r), (s), and (t) are added to 110 subsection (1) of section 626.611, Florida Statutes, to read: 111 626.611âGrounds for compulsory refusal, suspension, or 112 revocation of agentâs, title agencyâs, adjusterâs, customer 113 representativeâs, service representativeâs, or managing general 114 agentâs license or appointment.â 115 (1)âThe department shall deny an application for, suspend, 116 revoke, or refuse to renew or continue the license or 117 appointment of any applicant, agent, title agency, adjuster, 118 customer representative, service representative, or managing 119 general agent, and it shall suspend or revoke the eligibility to 120 hold a license or appointment of any such person, if it finds 121 that as to the applicant, licensee, or appointee any one or more 122 of the following applicable grounds exist: 123 (r)âCommitting a felony or misdemeanor during the 124 adjustment, investigation, or handling of an insurance claim. 125 (s)âEngaging in discriminatory claims-handling practices 126 based on race, color, national origin, religion, sex, gender, 127 marital status, disability, or age, as demonstrated by competent 128 substantial evidence. 129 (t)âKnowingly misinterpreting or directing another to 130 misinterpret, any provision of an insurance policy or the 131 insurance code in a manner that creates coverage limitations, 132 exclusions, or conditions not found in the plain text of such 133 policy or code. 134 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (15) of section 135 626.854, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 136 626.854ââPublic adjusterâ defined; prohibitions.âThe 137 Legislature finds that it is necessary for the protection of the 138 public to regulate public insurance adjusters and to prevent the 139 unauthorized practice of law. 140 (15)âThe public adjuster must ensure that prompt notice is 141 given of the claim to the insurer, the public adjusterâs 142 contract is provided to the insurer, the property is available 143 for inspection of the loss or damage by the insurer, and the 144 insurer is given an opportunity to interview the insured 145 directly about the loss and claim. The insurer must be allowed 146 to obtain necessary information to investigate and respond to 147 the claim. 148 (a)âThe insurer may not exclude the public adjuster or the 149 public adjusterâs attorney from its in-person meetings with the 150 insured. The insurer shall meet or communicate with the public 151 adjuster or the public adjusterâs attorney in an effort to reach 152 agreement as to the scope of the covered loss under the 153 insurance policy. The public adjuster or the public adjusterâs 154 attorney shall meet or communicate with the insurer in an effort 155 to reach agreement as to the scope of the covered loss under the 156 insurance policy. This section does not impair the terms and 157 conditions of the insurance policy in effect at the time the 158 claim is filed. 159 Section 5.âParagraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 160 626.9541, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 161 626.9541âUnfair methods of competition and unfair or 162 deceptive acts or practices defined.â 163 (1)âUNFAIR METHODS OF COMPETITION AND UNFAIR OR DECEPTIVE 164 ACTS.âThe following are defined as unfair methods of competition 165 and unfair or deceptive acts or practices: 166 (i)âUnfair claim settlement practices.â 167 1.âAttempting to settle claims on the basis of an 168 application, when serving as a binder or intended to become a 169 part of the policy, or any other material document which was 170 altered without notice to, or knowledge or consent of, the 171 insured; 172 2.âA material misrepresentation made to an insured or any 173 other person having an interest in the proceeds payable under 174 such contract or policy, for the purpose and with the intent of 175 effecting settlement of such claims, loss, or damage under such 176 contract or policy on less favorable terms than those provided 177 in, and contemplated by, such contract or policy; 178 3.âCommitting or performing with such frequency as to 179 indicate a general business practice any of the following: 180 a.âFailing to adopt and implement standards for the proper 181 investigation of claims; 182 b.âMisrepresenting pertinent facts or insurance policy 183 provisions relating to coverages at issue; 184 c.âFailing to acknowledge and act promptly upon 185 communications with respect to claims; 186 d.âDenying claims without conducting reasonable 187 investigations based upon available information; 188 e.âFailing to affirm or deny full or partial coverage of 189 claims, and, as to partial coverage, the dollar amount or extent 190 of coverage, or failing to provide a written statement that the 191 claim is being investigated, upon the written request of the 192 insured within 30 days after proof-of-loss statements have been 193 completed; 194 f.âFailing to promptly provide a reasonable explanation in 195 writing to the insured of the basis in the insurance policy, in 196 relation to the facts or applicable law, for denial of a claim 197 or for the offer of a compromise settlement; 198 g.âFailing to promptly notify the insured of any additional 199 information necessary for the processing of a claim; 200 h.âFailing to clearly explain the nature of the requested 201 information and the reasons why such information is necessary; 202 i.âFailing to pay personal injury protection insurance 203 claims within the time periods required by s. 627.736(4)(b). The 204 office may order the insurer to pay restitution to a 205 policyholder, medical provider, or other claimant, including 206 interest at a rate consistent with the amount set forth in s. 207 55.03(1), for the time period within which an insurer fails to 208 pay claims as required by law. Restitution is in addition to any 209 other penalties allowed by law, including, but not limited to, 210 the suspension of the insurerâs certificate of authority; or 211 j.âAltering or amending an insurance adjusterâs report 212 without: 213 (I)âProviding a detailed explanation as to why any change 214 that has the effect of reducing the estimate of the loss was 215 made; and 216 (II)âIncluding on the report or as an addendum to the 217 report a detailed list of all changes made to the report and the 218 identity of the person who ordered each change; or 219 (III)âRetaining all versions of the report, and including 220 within each such version, for each change made within such 221 version of the report, the identity of each person who made or 222 ordered such change; or 223 4.âFailing to pay undisputed amounts of partial or full 224 benefits owed under first-party property insurance policies 225 within 60 days after an insurer receives notice of a residential 226 property insurance claim, determines the amounts of partial or 227 full benefits, and agrees to coverage, unless payment of the 228 undisputed benefits is prevented by factors beyond the control 229 of the insurer as defined in s. 627.70131(5); 230 5.âKnowingly asserting a policy defense without a 231 reasonable basis under the express language of the policy or 232 applicable law; or 233 6.âFailing to disclose a policy defense promptly in writing 234 when issuing a denial or contested coverage determination. 235 Section 6.âPresent subsection (10) of section 626.9743, 236 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (11), a new 237 subsection (10) is added to that section, and subsections (2) 238 and (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of that section are 239 amended, to read: 240 626.9743âClaim settlement practices relating to motor 241 vehicle insurance.â 242 (2)âAn insurer may not, when liability and damages owed 243 under the policy are reasonably clear, recommend that a third 244 party claimant make a claim under his or her own policy solely 245 to avoid paying the claim under the policy issued by that 246 insurer. However, the insurer may identify options to a third 247 party claimant relative to the repair of his or her vehicle. 248 When liability and damages owed under the policy are reasonably 249 clear, the insurer, upon request by the third-party claimant, 250 must promptly provide the third-party claimant with payment or 251 assistance for loss of use of his or her motor vehicle, 252 including reasonable temporary transportation, to the extent 253 that such coverage would have been available under the policy if 254 the loss had been sustained by the first-party insured, subject 255 to the policyâs terms, conditions, and applicable limits. 256 (4)âWhen an insurer elects to repair a motor vehicle, an 257 insurer may not require the use of replacement parts in the 258 repair of a motor vehicle which are not at least equivalent in 259 kind and quality to the damaged parts prior to the loss in terms 260 of color, size, fit, appearance, and performance. All such 261 replacement parts must comply with manufacturer specifications 262 and must be able to perform the same function and provide 263 durability and safety equivalent to the condition of the damaged 264 part immediately before the loss. If equivalent parts cannot 265 reasonably be obtained to restore a reasonably uniform 266 appearance, the insurer must replace the entire damaged area and 267 any adjoining areas necessary to achieve a reasonably uniform 268 appearance. Before any work is performed to repair the vehicle, 269 the insurer must provide the insured with a written repair plan 270 describing the scope of work, the basis for electing to repair, 271 and the steps necessary to complete the repairs. The insurer 272 must also identify and source all parts required for the repair 273 and provide the supplierâs name, any applicable stock keeping 274 unit or part number, and price and availability information for 275 such parts to the insured. 276 (5)âWhen the insurance policy provides for the adjustment 277 and settlement of first-party motor vehicle total losses on the 278 basis of actual cash value or replacement with another of like 279 kind and quality, the insurer shall use one of the following 280 methods: 281 (a)âThe insurer may elect a cash settlement based upon the 282 actual cost to purchase a comparable motor vehicle, including 283 sales tax, if applicable pursuant to subsection (9). 284 1.âFor purposes of this paragraph, the term âlocal market 285 areaâ means a geographical area within 50 miles of the insuredâs 286 primary residence. 287 2.âThe actual cost to purchase a comparable motor vehicle 288 Such cost may be derived from any of the following methods: 289 a.1.âWhen comparable motor vehicles are available in the 290 local market area, the cost of two or more such comparable motor 291 vehicles available within the preceding 90 days.; 292 b.2.âThe retail cost as determined from a generally 293 recognized used motor vehicle industry source such as: 294 (I)a.âAn electronic database if the pertinent portions of 295 the valuation documents generated by the database are provided 296 by the insurer to the first-party insured upon request; or 297 (II)b.âA guidebook that is generally available to the 298 general public if the insurer identifies the guidebook used as 299 the basis for the retail cost to the first-party insured upon 300 request.; or 301 c.3.âThe retail cost using two or more quotations obtained 302 by the insurer from two or more licensed dealers in the local 303 market area. 304 3.âIf the insurer seeks to obtain market data outside the 305 local market area to determine the actual cost to purchase a 306 comparable motor vehicle, the insurer must obtain written 307 approval from the insured. The written approval must include the 308 insuredâs signature and the following statement in no smaller 309 than 18-point bold, uppercase type: 310 311 I AUTHORIZE THE INSURER TO EXPAND THE LOCAL MARKET 312 AREA BEYOND 50 MILES FROM MY PRIMARY RESIDENCE FOR THE 313 PURPOSE OF LOCATING MARKET DATA NECESSARY TO DETERMINE 314 THE ACTUAL CASH VALUE OF MY VEHICLE, PURSUANT TO S. 315 626.9743, FLORIDA STATUTES. 316 317 (10)(a)âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 318 1.ââDiminished valueâ means the loss in the market value of 319 a motor vehicle which remains after repairs are performed to 320 restore the vehicle to its pre-loss physical condition as to 321 performance and appearance, due to the vehicle having sustained 322 damage and having an accident history. 323 2.ââLocal market areaâ has the same meaning as in 324 subparagraph (5)(a)1. 325 (b)âWhen a motor vehicle is repaired due to a covered loss, 326 the insurer shall compensate the claimant for diminished value. 327 (c)âDiminished value shall be calculated by one of the 328 following methods: 329 1.âAveraging the differences obtained from subtracting from 330 the actual cash value of the vehicle as determined under 331 subsection (5) the market values of two comparable motor 332 vehicles located within the local market area. 333 a.âThe two comparable motor vehicles must have sustained 334 comparable damage and repair. 335 b.âIf an insurer seeks to obtain valuation data from 336 outside the local market area, it must comply with the 337 requirements in subparagraph (5)(a)3. 338 2.âObtaining no fewer than four dealer trade-in quotations 339 for the repaired vehicle, averaging the quotations, and 340 increasing the amount by 20 percent. 341 (d)âThe insurer shall provide to the insured written 342 documentation supporting the diminished value determination used 343 in the claim settlement. 344 (e)âAny policy provision that purports to exclude 345 diminished value for repaired motor vehicles is void and 346 unenforceable. 347 Section 7.âSubsection (2) of section 626.9744, Florida 348 Statutes, is amended to read: 349 626.9744âClaim settlement practices relating to property 350 insurance.âUnless otherwise provided by the policy, when a 351 homeownerâs insurance policy provides for the adjustment and 352 settlement of first-party losses based on repair or replacement 353 cost, the following requirements apply: 354 (2)âIn adjusting or settling a loss that involves the use 355 of replacement items, parts, or materials, the insurer shall use 356 replacement items, parts, or materials that are at least 357 equivalent in kind and quality to the damaged items, parts, or 358 materials before the loss in terms of color, size, fit, 359 appearance, performance, and durability. When a loss requires 360 replacement of items, parts, or materials, and the replaced 361 items, parts, or materials do not match the existing undamaged 362 areas in quality, color, or size, or appearance, the insurer 363 shall make reasonable repairs or replacement of items, parts, or 364 materials in adjoining areas as necessary to achieve a 365 reasonably uniform appearance. In determining the extent of the 366 repairs or replacement of items in adjoining areas, the insurer 367 may consider the cost of repairing or replacing the undamaged 368 portions of the property, the degree of uniformity that can be 369 achieved without such cost, the remaining useful life of the 370 undamaged portion, and other relevant factors. Before any work 371 is performed to repair or replace damaged items, parts, or 372 materials, the insurer must provide the insured with a written 373 plan describing the scope of work, the basis for electing to 374 repair or replace, and the steps necessary to complete such 375 work. The insurer must also identify and source all replacement 376 items, parts, or materials required to complete such work and 377 provide the supplierâs name, any applicable stock keeping unit 378 or part number, and price and availability information for such 379 items, parts, or materials to the insured. 380 Section 8.âSubsection (1) of section 627.4025, Florida 381 Statutes, is amended to read: 382 627.4025âResidential coverage and hurricane coverage 383 defined.â 384 (1)âResidential coverage includes both personal lines and 385 commercial lines coverage. Personal lines residential coverage 386 includes residential coverage, which consists of the type of 387 coverage provided by homeowner, mobile home owner, dwelling, 388 tenant, condominium unit owner, cooperative unit owner, and 389 similar personal lines residential policies., and Commercial 390 lines residential coverage includes, which consists of the type 391 of coverage provided by condominium association, cooperative 392 association, apartment building, and similar commercial lines 393 residential policies, including policies covering the common 394 elements of a homeowners association. Residential coverage for 395 personal lines and commercial lines as set forth in this section 396 includes policies that provide coverage for particular perils 397 such as windstorm and hurricane or coverage for insurer 398 insolvency or deductibles. 399 Section 9.âSubsection (3) is added to section 627.418, 400 Florida Statutes, to read: 401 627.418âValidity of noncomplying contracts.â 402 (3)âAn insurer may not impose or enforce any policy 403 condition or requirement that is not authorized by this 404 insurance code unless the condition or requirement has been 405 submitted to and approved by the office. Any such unauthorized 406 condition or requirement is void and unenforceable. If a policy 407 contains any condition or requirement not authorized by this 408 insurance code but approved by the office, the insurer must 409 clearly disclose that the provision is not authorized by the 410 insurance code to the insured at the time of issuance along with 411 necessary definitions to understand the provisions of the policy 412 and the steps required for compliance with the provisions of the 413 policy, using plain language, and must allow the insured to 414 cancel the policy within 10 days after receipt at no cost. The 415 disclosure must include the following notice, printed in bold 416 type: 417 418 IMPORTANT NOTICE: SOME PROVISIONS IN THIS POLICY ARE 419 NOT ESTABLISHED BY FLORIDA STATUTES. FAILURE TO MEET 420 THESE CONTRACTUAL REQUIREMENTS MAY AFFECT YOUR 421 COVERAGE OR RESULT IN CLAIM DELAY OR DENIAL. YOU HAVE 422 RIGHTS UNDER FLORIDA LAW. YOU MAY CANCEL THIS POLICY 423 WITHIN 10 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT AT NO COST. 424 Section 10.âSubsection (2) of section 627.426, Florida 425 Statutes, is amended to read: 426 627.426âClaims administration.â 427 (2)âA liability insurer may shall not be permitted to deny 428 coverage based on a particular coverage defense unless all of 429 the following conditions are met: 430 (a)1.âWithin 30 days after the liability insurer knew or 431 should have known of the coverage defense, written notice of 432 reservation of rights to assert a coverage defense is given to 433 the named insured by United States postal proof of mailing, 434 registered or certified mail, or other mailing using the 435 Intelligent Mail barcode or other similar tracking method used 436 or approved by the United States Postal Service sent to the last 437 known address of the insured or by hand delivery. Such notice of 438 reservation of rights must include all the following: 439 a.âA clear statement of the factual issue giving rise to 440 the reservation of rights. 441 b.âAn explanation, in plain language, of why the issue may 442 affect coverage. 443 c.âA description of any additional information or 444 documentation needed from the insured. 445 d.âA description of the next steps in the investigative 446 process and the expected timeframes for completing those steps. 447 e.âIf the insurer determines that fraud or 448 misrepresentation may affect the claim, identification of the 449 specific facts supporting that determination. 450 2.âA notice of reservation of rights given under this 451 section may not be used to extend, delay, or suspend the payment 452 of a covered loss or any statutory deadline for paying or 453 denying a claim under this code.; and 454 (b)âWithin 60 days after of compliance with paragraph (a) 455 or receipt of a summons and complaint naming the insured as a 456 defendant, whichever is later, but in no case later than 30 days 457 before trial, the insurer: 458 1.âGives written notice to the named insured by United 459 States postal proof of mailing, registered or certified mail, or 460 other mailing using the Intelligent Mail barcode or other 461 similar tracking method used or approved by the United States 462 Postal Service of its refusal to defend the insured; 463 2.âObtains from the insured a nonwaiver agreement following 464 full disclosure of the specific facts and policy provisions upon 465 which the coverage defense is asserted and the duties, 466 obligations, and liabilities of the insurer during and following 467 the pendency of the subject litigation; or 468 3.âRetains independent counsel which is mutually agreeable 469 to the parties. Reasonable fees for the counsel may be agreed 470 upon between the parties or, if no agreement is reached, shall 471 be set by the court. 472 Section 11.âNotwithstanding the repeal of section 627.428, 473 Florida Statutes, in section 11 of chapter 2023-15, Laws of 474 Florida, section 627.428, Florida Statutes, is revived, 475 reenacted, and amended to read: 476 627.428âAttorney fees and costs.â 477 (1)âExcept as provided in subsection (4), upon the 478 rendition of a judgment or decree by any of the courts of this 479 state against an insurer and in favor of any named or omnibus 480 insured or the named beneficiary under a policy or contract 481 executed by the insurer, the trial court or, in the event of an 482 appeal in which the insured or beneficiary prevails, the 483 appellate court shall adjudge or decree against the insurer and 484 in favor of the insured or beneficiary a reasonable sum as fees 485 or compensation for the insuredâs or beneficiaryâs attorney 486 prosecuting the suit in which the recovery is had. 487 (2)âAs to suits based on claims arising under life 488 insurance policies or annuity contracts, no such attorney fees 489 shall be allowed if such suit was commenced prior to expiration 490 of 60 days after proof of the claim was duly filed with the 491 insurer. 492 (3)âWhen so awarded, compensation or fees of the attorney 493 shall be included in the judgment or decree rendered in the 494 case. 495 (4)âIn a suit arising under a residential or commercial 496 property insurance policy, there is no right to attorney fees 497 and costs, including public adjuster costs and costs related to 498 the adjustment of the loss, under this section unless the 499 insured or policyholder prevails in a lawsuit against an insurer 500 for underpayment, wrongful claim denial, or bad faith practices. 501 Section 12.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 502 627.70131, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 503 627.70131âInsurerâs duty to acknowledge communications 504 regarding claims; investigation.â 505 (7)(a)âWithin 30 60 days after an insurer receives notice 506 of an initial, reopened, or supplemental property insurance 507 claim from a policyholder, the insurer shall pay or deny such 508 claim or a portion of the claim unless the failure to pay or 509 deny is caused by factors beyond the insurerâs control of the 510 insurer. The insurer shall provide a clear, written reasonable 511 explanation in writing to the policyholder which outlines the 512 reasoning of the basis in the insurance policy, in relation to 513 the facts or applicable law, for the payment, denial, or partial 514 denial of the a claim, referencing relevant sections of the 515 insurance policy or applicable facts or laws. Such explanation 516 may not be solely a recitation of policy provisions without 517 application of those provisions to the facts of the claim. If 518 the insurerâs claim payment is less than specified in any 519 insurerâs detailed estimate of the amount of the loss, the 520 insurer must provide a reasonable explanation in writing of the 521 difference to the policyholder. Any payment for of an initial or 522 supplemental claim or portion of such claim made 60 days after 523 the insurer receives notice of the claim, or made after the 524 expiration of any additional timeframe provided to pay or deny a 525 claim or a portion of a claim made pursuant to an order of the 526 office finding factors beyond the insurerâs control of the 527 insurer, whichever is later, bears interest at the rate set 528 forth in s. 55.03. Interest begins to accrue from the date the 529 insurer receives notice of the claim. If the insurer fails to 530 pay the full amount owed on the claim within 90 days after the 531 insurer receives notice of the claim or within any extended 532 timeframe authorized by order of the office, the insurer has an 533 uncontestable obligation to pay the amount owed, together with 534 interest as provided in this subsection and an additional equal 535 interest penalty. The department may enforce such obligation. 536 The provisions of this subsection may not be waived, voided, or 537 nullified by the terms of the insurance policy. If there is a 538 right to prejudgment interest, the insured must select whether 539 to receive prejudgment interest or interest under this 540 subsection. Interest is payable when the claim or portion of the 541 claim is paid, even if the payment is contingent upon a release. 542 Failure to comply with this subsection constitutes a violation 543 of this code. However, failure to comply with this subsection 544 does not form the sole basis for a private cause of action. 545 Section 13.âSection 627.70151, Florida Statutes, is amended 546 to read: 547 627.70151âAppraisal; conflicts of interest; costs.â 548 (1)âAn insurer that offers residential coverage as defined 549 in s. 627.4025, or a policyholder that uses an appraisal clause 550 in a property insurance contract to establish a process for 551 estimating or evaluating the amount of loss through the use of 552 an impartial umpire, may challenge an umpireâs impartiality and 553 disqualify the proposed umpire only if any of the following 554 conditions exists: 555 (a)(1)âA familial relationship within the third degree 556 exists between the umpire and a party or a representative of a 557 party; 558 (b)(2)âThe umpire has previously represented a party in a 559 professional capacity in the same claim or matter involving the 560 same property; 561 (c)(3)âThe umpire has represented another person in a 562 professional capacity on the same or a substantially related 563 matter that includes the claim, the same property or an adjacent 564 property, and the other personâs interests are materially 565 adverse to the interests of a party; or 566 (d)(4)âThe umpire has worked as an employer or employee of 567 a party within the preceding 5 years. 568 (2)âThe insurer must bear the reasonable cost of the 569 appraisal process under this section unless otherwise agreed by 570 the parties. 571 Section 14.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.